Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB68.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 532 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A defendant shall be subject to an enhanced term of imprisonment under
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/3/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1065
subsection (3) of this section if he or she is convicted of a crime under KRS
Chapter 507, 507A, 508, 509, 510, or 525, or under KRS 512.020, 512.030,
513.020, 513.030, or 513.040, or of the attempt to commit a crime under those
chapters or statutes; and it is proven beyond a reasonable doubt that:
(a) 1. The defendant intentionally selected the person against whom the
crime was committed; and
2. The primary motivation in selecting the person was that person's
actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion,
mental or physical disability, gender identity or expression, or sexual
orientation; or
(b) 1. The defendant intentionally committed a crime against property
associated with a person; and
2. The primary motivation in selecting the property was the person's
actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion,
mental or physical disability, gender identity or expression, or sexual
orientation.
(2) Unless a jury trial has been waived, when a defendant is convicted of a crime
outlined in subsection (1) of this section and the defendant is charged with
intentionally committing the underlying offense because of a person's actual or
perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, mental or physical
disability, gender identity or expression, or sexual orientation:
(a) The court shall conduct a hearing, separate from the proceeding that
resulted in the defendant's conviction for the underlying offense, to
determine whether the person intentionally committed the underlying
offense primarily because of a person's actual or perceived race, color,
ethnicity, national origin, religion, mental or physical disability, gender
identity or expression, or sexual orientation;
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/3/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1065
(b) The hearing shall be conducted by the same court and jury that convicted
the defendant of the underlying offense, unless the court for good cause
discharges that jury and impanels a new jury for that purpose; and
(c) The jury shall determine:
1. Whether, beyond a reasonable doubt, the person intentionally
committed the underlying offense primarily because of a person's
actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion,
mental or physical disability, gender identity or expression, or sexual
orientation; and
2. The enhanced term of imprisonment to be imposed pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section, if any.
(3) When a defendant has been found to have intentionally committed an offense
outlined in subsection (1) of this section primarily because of a person's actual or
perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, mental or physical
disability, gender identity or expression, or sexual orientation, his or her sentence
for the underlying offense shall be enhanced as follows:
(a) If the underlying offense is a Class A or B misdemeanor, the term of
imprisonment shall be increased by at least half of the maximum
imprisonment sentence for that misdemeanor and the fine shall be at least
half of the maximum fine amount for that misdemeanor as provided in KRS
534.040;
(b) If the underlying offense is a Class D felony, the term of imprisonment shall
be increased by one (1) to five (5) years;
(c) If the underlying offense is a Class C felony, the term of imprisonment shall
be increased by five (5) to ten (10) years; and
(d) If the underlying offense is a Class A or B felony, the term of imprisonment
shall be increased by ten (10) to twenty (20) years.
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/3/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1065
(4) Any defendant who receives an enhanced term of imprisonment under this
section shall not be eligible for probation, shock probation, conditional discharge,
parole, or any other form of early release.
Section 2. KRS 15.334 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall approve mandatory training subjects
to be taught to all students attending a law enforcement basic training course that
include but are not limited to:
(a) Abuse, neglect, and exploitation of the elderly and other crimes against the
elderly, including the use of multidisciplinary teams in the investigation and
prosecution of crimes against the elderly;
(b) The dynamics of domestic violence, pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined
in KRS 620.020, child physical and sexual abuse, and rape; child
development; the effects of abuse and crime on adult and child victims,
including the impact of abuse and violence on child development; legal
remedies for protection; lethality and risk issues; profiles of offenders and
offender treatment; model protocols for addressing domestic violence, rape,
pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020, and child abuse;
available community resources and victim services; and reporting
requirements. This training shall be developed in consultation with legal,
victim services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with
expertise in domestic violence, child abuse, and rape. Training in recognizing
pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with
organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of
pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services;
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency
virus syndrome;
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/3/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1065
(d) Identification and investigation of, responding to, and reporting bias-related
crime, victimization, or intimidation that is a result of or reasonably related to
race, color, ethnicity,[religion, sex, or] national origin, religion, mental or
physical disability, gender identity or expression, or sexual orientation;
(e) The characteristics and dynamics of human trafficking, state and federal laws
relating to human trafficking, the investigation of cases involving human
trafficking, including but not limited to screening for human trafficking, and
resources for assistance to the victims of human trafficking;
(f) Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall require that a law enforcement
basic training course include at least eight (8) hours of training relevant to
sexual assault; and
(g) Education on female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125, including
the risk factors associated with female genital mutilation, the criminal
penalties for committing female genital mutilation, and the psychological and
health effects on a victim of female genital mutilation.
(2) (a) The council shall develop and approve mandatory in-service training courses
to be presented to all certified peace officers. The council may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A setting forth
the deadlines by which all certified peace officers shall attend the mandatory
in-service training courses.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall establish a forty (40) hour sexual
assault investigation training course. After January 1, 2019, agencies shall
maintain officers on staff who have completed the forty (40) hour sexual
assault investigation training course in accordance with the following:
1. Agencies with more than ten (10) but fewer than twenty-one (21) full-
time officers shall maintain one (1) officer who has completed the forty
(40) hour sexual assault investigation training course;
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/3/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1065
2. Agencies with twenty-one (21) or more but fewer than fifty-one (51)
full-time officers shall maintain at least two (2) officers who have
completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training
course; and
3. Agencies with fifty-one (51) or more full-time officers shall maintain at
least four (4) officers who have completed the sexual assault
investigation course.
(c) An agency shall not make an officer directly responsible for the investigation
or processing of sexual assault offenses unless that officer has completed the
forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course.
(d) The council may, upon application by any agency, grant an exemption from
the training requirements set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection if that
agency, by limitations arising from its scope of authority, does not conduct
sexual assault investigations.
(e) Any agency failing to comply with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection
shall, from the date the noncompliance commences, have one (1) year to
reestablish the minimum number of trained officers required.
(3) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall provide training on the subjects of
domestic violence and abuse and may do so utilizing currently available
technology. All certified peace officers shall be required to complete this training at
least once every two (2) years.
(4) The council shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish mandatory basic training and in-service training courses.
Section 3. KRS 17.1523 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The uniform offense report shall contain provisions for obtaining information as to
whether or not specific crimes appear from their facts and circumstances to be
caused as a result of or reasonably related to race, color, ethnicity,[religion, sex, or]
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/3/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1065
national origin, religion, mental or physical disability, gender identity or
expression, or sexual orientation.
(2) All law enforcement officers, when completing a uniform offense report, shall note
thereon whether or not the offense appears to be caused as a result of or reasonably
related to race, color, ethnicity,[religion, sex, or] national origin, religion, mental
or physical disability, gender identity or expression, or sexual orientation, or
attempts to victimize or intimidate another due to any of the foregoing causes.
(3) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall, annually, as a part of the crime reports
report on crimes which appear to have been caused by the factors cited in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 508 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of using hate symbols to intimidate when he or she
intentionally uses, displays, or sends a symbol historically used as a symbol of
impending violence, and thereby places another person in reasonable
apprehension of physical injury.
(2) Using hate symbols to intimidate is a Class A misdemeanor.
Section 5. The following KRS sections are repealed:
49.320 Victim of hate crime deemed victim of criminally injurious conduct.
532.031 Hate crimes -- Finding -- Effect -- Definitions.
Section 6. The restrictions of KRS 6.945(1) shall not apply to Sections 1 to 4 of
this Act.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/3/2025 4:17 PM Jacketed